Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agriculture improvement act of 2018" means sections 7605, 10113, 10114, and 12619 of the agriculture improvement act of 2018, P.L. 115-334.

(2) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

(3) "Crop" means hemp grown as an agricultural commodity.

(4) "Cultivar" means a variation of the plant Cannabis sativa L. that has been developed through cultivation by selective breeding.

(5) "Department" means the Washington state department of agriculture.

(6) "Food" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 69.07.010.

(7) "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.

(8) "Hemp consumable" means a product that is sold or provided to another person, that is:

(a) Made of hemp;

(b) Not a cannabis product, as defined in RCW 69.50.101; and

(c) Intended to be consumed or absorbed inside the body by any means, including inhalation, ingestion, or insertion.

(9) "Hemp processor" means a person who takes possession of raw hemp material with the intent to modify, package, or sell a transitional or finished hemp product.

(10)(a) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the genera Cannabis, cultivated or possessed by a grower, whether growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of 0.3 percent or less by dry weight that was grown under the industrial hemp research program as it existed on December 31, 2019.

(b) "Industrial hemp" does not include plants of the genera Cannabis that meet the definition of "cannabis."

(11) "Postharvest test" means a test of tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp after being harvested based on:

(a) Ground whole plant samples without heat applied; or

(b) Other approved testing methods.

(12) "Process" means the processing, compounding, or conversion of hemp into hemp commodities or products.

(13) "Produce" or "production" means the planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of hemp including hemp seed.

[ 2023 c 365 s 1; 2022 c 16 s 19; 2021 c 104 s 2; 2019 c 158 s 2.]

NOTES:

Construction—2023 c 365: See note following RCW 69.50.326.

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Intent—2021 c 104: "The legislature intends to authorize and establish hemp processor registration and hemp extract certification necessary for entrance and compliance with interstate and international commerce and business requirements or stipulations in regard to hemp processing. A voluntary processor registration or hemp extract certification in lieu of a hemp processor license will allow persons or companies to ship transitional or final hemp products to states and countries that require a hemp processor license or registration." [ 2021 c 104 s 1.]